Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202583-171
Department of Correctional Services; created; duties.

There is hereby created a Department of Correctional Services which shall:

(1) Maintain and administer facilities required for the custody, control, correctional treatment, and rehabilitation of persons committed to the department and for the safekeeping of such other persons as may be remanded to the department in accordance with law;

(2) Develop policies and programs for the correctional treatment and rehabilitation of persons committed to the department;

(3) Supervise parolees who have been committed to the department;

(4) Administer parole services in the facilities and in the community; and

(5) Maintain all records and files associated with the Board of Parole, including relating to individuals subject to lifetime community supervision under section 83-174.03. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the department from maintaining daily records and files associated with the Board of Pardons.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 2, p. 3073;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 39;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 26;

Laws 2015, LB598, § 23;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 16;

Laws 2024, LB631, § 26;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 133.